Tennessee, session 114, SB1496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204(m)(1), is amended by
adding the following as new subdivisions:
(SS) "Clinical informatics";
(TT) "Lifestyle medicine"; or
(UU) "Medical virtualist";
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1496
010361
- 1 -